North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-09 Parent and Child

14-09-00.1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Decisionmaking responsibility” means the responsibility to make decisions concerning the child. The term may refer to decisions on all issues or on specified issues, but not child support issues.

“Harm” means negative changes in a child’s health which occur when an individual responsible for the child’s welfare:

Inflicts, or allows to be inflicted, upon the child, physical or mental injury, including injuries sustained as a result of excessive corporal punishment; or

Commits, allows to be committed, or conspires to commit, against the child, a sex offense as defined in chapter 12.1-20.

“Parental rights and responsibilities” means all rights and responsibilities a parent has concerning the parent’s child.

“Parenting plan” means a written plan describing each parent’s rights and responsibilities.

“Parenting schedule” means the schedule of when the child is in the care of each parent.

“Parenting time” means the time when the child is to be in the care of a parent.

“Primary residential responsibility” means a parent with more than fifty percent of the residential responsibility.

“Residential responsibility” means a parent’s responsibility to provide a home for the child.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 4; 2019, ch. 54, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

14-09-01.
Legitimacy of children born in wedlock. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 11.

14-09-02.
Children born after dissolution of marriage or before wedlock — Legitimacy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 11.

14-09-03.
Who may dispute presumption of legitimacy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 11.

14-09-04.
Custody of legitimate child. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 12.

14-09-05.
Custody of illegitimate child. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 12.

14-09-05.1.
Grandparental rights of visitation to unmarried minor child — Mediation or arbitration. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 179, § 1; 1993, ch. 150, § 1; 2001, ch. 153, § 1; 2009, ch. 149, § 3; repealed by 2019, ch. 131, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

14-09-06.
Priority of custody of father and mother. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 12.

14-09-06.1.
Awarding custody — Best interests and welfare of child. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 12.

14-09-06.2.
Best interests and welfare of child — Court consideration — Factors.

For the purpose of parental rights and responsibilities, the best interests and welfare of the child is determined by the court’s consideration and evaluation of all factors affecting the best interests and welfare of the child. These factors include all of the following when applicable:

The love, affection, and other emotional ties existing between the parents and child and the ability of each parent to provide the child with nurture, love, affection, and guidance.

The ability of each parent to assure that the child receives adequate food, clothing, shelter, medical care, and a safe environment.

The child’s developmental needs and the ability of each parent to meet those needs, both in the present and in the future.

The sufficiency and stability of each parent’s home environment, the impact of extended family, the length of time the child has lived in each parent’s home, and the desirability of maintaining continuity in the child’s home and community.

The willingness and ability of each parent to facilitate and encourage a close and continuing relationship between the other parent and the child.

The moral fitness of the parents, as that fitness impacts the child.

The mental and physical health of the parents, as that health impacts the child.

The home, school, and community records of the child and the potential effect of any change.

If the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that a child is of sufficient maturity to make a sound judgment, the court may give substantial weight to the preference of the mature child. The court also shall give due consideration to other factors that may have affected the child’s preference, including whether the child’s preference was based on undesirable or improper influences.

Evidence of domestic violence. In determining parental rights and responsibilities, the court shall consider evidence of domestic violence. If the court finds credible evidence that domestic violence has occurred, and there exists one incident of domestic violence which resulted in serious bodily injury or involved the use of a dangerous weapon or there exists a pattern of domestic violence within a reasonable time proximate to the proceeding, this combination creates a rebuttable presumption that a parent who has perpetrated domestic violence may not be awarded residential responsibility for the child. This presumption may be overcome only by clear and convincing evidence that the best interests of the child require that parent have residential responsibility. The court shall cite specific findings of fact to show that the residential responsibility best protects the child and the parent or other family or household member who is the victim of domestic violence. If necessary to protect the welfare of the child, residential responsibility for a child may be awarded to a suitable third person, provided that the person would not allow access to a violent parent except as ordered by the court. If the court awards residential responsibility to a third person, the court shall give priority to the child’s nearest suitable adult relative. The fact that the abused parent suffers from the effects of the abuse may not be grounds for denying that parent residential responsibility. As used in this subdivision, “domestic violence” means domestic violence as defined in section 14-07.1-01. A court may consider, but is not bound by, a finding of domestic violence in another proceeding under chapter 14-07.1.

The interaction and inter-relationship, or the potential for interaction and inter- relationship, of the child with any person who resides in, is present, or frequents the household of a parent and who may significantly affect the child’s best interests. The court shall consider that person’s history of inflicting, or tendency to inflict, physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or the fear of physical harm, bodily injury, or assault, on other persons.

The making of false allegations not made in good faith, by one parent against the other, of harm to a child.

Any other factors considered by the court to be relevant to a particular parental rights and responsibilities dispute.

In a proceeding for parental rights and responsibilities of a child of a service member, a court may not consider a parent’s past deployment or possible future deployment in itself in determining the best interests of the child but may consider any significant impact on the best interests of the child of the parent’s past or possible future deployment.

In any proceeding under this chapter, the court, at any stage of the proceedings after final judgment, may make orders about what security is to be given for the care, custody, and support of the unmarried minor children of the marriage as from the circumstances of the parties and the nature of the case is equitable.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 194, § 3; 1989, ch. 178, § 2; 1991, ch. 148, § 2; 1993, ch. 144, § 2; 1993 ch. 151, § 1; 1997, ch. 147, § 2; 2009, ch. 149, § 5; 2013, ch. 123, § 1; 2019, ch. 54, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

Former Law.

This section as it read prior to the effective date of the 1989 amendments (April 7, 1989) would be applied to an action which was commenced before that date. Freed v. Freed, 454 N.W.2d 516, 1990 N.D. LEXIS 94 (N.D. 1990).

14-09-06.3.
Custody investigations and reports — Costs.

In contested proceedings dealing with parental rights and responsibilities the court, upon the request of either party, or, upon its own motion, may order an investigation and report concerning parenting rights and responsibilities regarding the child. The court shall designate a person or agency responsible for making the investigation and report, which designees may include the human service zone, public health officer, school officials, and any other public agency or private practitioner the court deems qualified to make the investigation.

The investigator may consult any person who may have information about the child and any potential arrangements for parenting rights and responsibilities, and upon order of the court may refer the child to any professional personnel for diagnosis.

The court shall mail the investigator’s report to counsel and to any party not represented by counsel at least thirty days before the hearing. The investigator shall make available to any such counsel or party the complete file of data and reports underlying the investigator’s report and the names and addresses of all persons whom the investigator has consulted. A party may call the investigator and any person whom the investigator has consulted for cross-examination at the hearing. A party may not waive the party’s right of cross-examination before the hearing.

The court shall enter an order for the costs of any such investigation against either or both parties, except that if the parties are indigent the expenses must be borne by the county where the child resided at the time the action was commenced or if a modification of parental rights and responsibilities, at the time the motion to modify is served.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 194, § 4; 1987, ch. 182, § 1; 2009, ch. 149, § 6; 2019, ch. 391, § 5, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 353, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

14-09-06.4.
Appointment of guardian ad litem or investigator for child in proceedings involving parental rights and responsibilities — Immunity.

In any action for an annulment, divorce, legal separation, or other action affecting marriage, when either party has reason for special concern as to the future of the minor child, and in any action when the parenting rights and responsibilities concerning the child is contested, either party to the action may petition the court for the appointment of a guardian ad litem to represent the child concerning parenting rights and responsibilities. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem or investigator on its own motion. If appointed, a guardian ad litem shall serve as an advocate of the child’s best interests. If appointed, the investigator shall provide those services as prescribed by the supreme court. The court may direct either or both parties to pay the guardian ad litem or investigator fee established by the court. If neither party is able to pay the fee, the court may direct the fee to be paid, in whole or in part, by the county where the child resided at the time the action was commenced. The court may direct either or both parties to reimburse the county, in whole or in part, for such payment. Any guardian ad litem or investigator appointed under this section who acts in good faith in making a report to the court is immune from any civil liability resulting from the report. For the purpose of determining good faith, the good faith of the guardian ad litem or investigator is a disputable presumption.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 170, § 1; 2001, ch. 150, § 2; 2009, ch. 149, § 7; 2019, ch. 391, § 6, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 353, § 5, effective August 1, 2021.

14-09-06.5.
Allegation of harm to child — Effect.

If the court finds that an allegation of harm to a child by one parent against the other is false and not made in good faith, the court shall order the parent making the false allegation to pay court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the other parent in responding to the allegation.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 151, § 2.

14-09-06.6.
Limitations on postjudgment modifications of primary residential responsibility.

Unless agreed to in writing by the parties, or if included in the parenting plan, no motion for an order to modify primary residential responsibility may be made earlier than two years after the date of entry of an order establishing primary residential responsibility, except in accordance with subsection 3.

Unless agreed to in writing by the parties, or if included in the parenting plan, if a motion for modification has been disposed of upon its merits, no subsequent motion may be filed within two years of disposition of the prior motion, except in accordance with subsection 5.

The time limitation in subsections 1 and 2 does not apply if the court finds:

The persistent and willful denial or interference with parenting time;

The child’s present environment may endanger the child’s physical or emotional health or impair the child’s emotional development; or

The primary residential responsibility for the child has changed to the other parent for longer than six months.

A party seeking modification of an order concerning primary residential responsibility shall serve and file moving papers and supporting affidavits and shall give notice to the other party to the proceeding who may serve and file a response and opposing affidavits. The court shall consider the motion on briefs and without oral argument or evidentiary hearing and shall deny the motion unless the court finds the moving party has established a prima facie case justifying a modification. The court shall set a date for an evidentiary hearing only if a prima facie case is established.

The court may not modify the primary residential responsibility within the two-year period following the date of entry of an order establishing primary residential responsibility unless the court finds the modification is necessary to serve the best interests of the child and:

The persistent and willful denial or interference with parenting time;

The child’s present environment may endanger the child’s physical or emotional health or impair the child’s emotional development; or

The residential responsibility for the child has changed to the other parent for longer than six months.

The court may modify the primary residential responsibility after the two-year period following the date of entry of an order establishing primary residential responsibility if the court finds:

On the basis of facts that have arisen since the prior order or which were unknown to the court at the time of the prior order, a material change has occurred in the circumstances of the child or the parties; and

The modification is necessary to serve the best interests of the child.

The court may modify a prior order concerning primary residential responsibility at any time if the court finds a stipulated agreement by the parties to modify the order is in the best interests of the child.

Upon a motion to modify primary residential responsibility under this section, the burden of proof is on the moving party.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 149, § 1; 2007, ch. 147, § 1; 2009, ch. 149, § 8; 2013, ch. 123, § 2.

14-09-07.
Residence of child.

A parent with primary residential responsibility for a child may not change the primary residence of the child to another state except upon order of the court or with the consent of the other parent, if the other parent has been given parenting time by the decree.

A parent with equal residential responsibility for a child may not change the residence of the child to another state except with consent of the other parent or order of the court allowing the move and awarding that parent primary residential responsibility.

A court order is not required if the other parent:

Has not exercised parenting time for a period of one year; or

Has moved to another state and is more than fifty miles [80.47 kilometers] from the residence of the parent with primary residential responsibility.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 104; R.C. 1895, § 2794; R.C. 1899, § 2794; R.C. 1905, § 4106; C.L. 1913, § 4438; R.C. 1943, § 14-0907; S.L. 1979, ch. 194, § 5; 1991, ch. 150, § 1; 2009, ch. 149, § 9.

14-09-08.
Mutual duty to support children.

Parents shall give their children support and education suitable to the child’s circumstances. The court may compel either or both of the parents to provide for the support of their children.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 89; R.C. 1895, § 2779; R.C. 1899, § 2779; R.C. 1905, § 4091; C.L. 1913, § 4423; R.C. 1943, § 14-0908; S.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 31; 1985, ch. 196, § 1; 2001, ch. 149, § 12.

Cross-References.

Abandonment or nonsupport of child a felony, see N.D.C.C. §§ 14-07-15, 14-09-22.

Support of child born out of wedlock, see N.D.C.C. ch. 14-20.

14-09-08.1.
Support payments — Payment to state disbursement unit — Transfer of proceedings for enforcement of decree — Procedures upon failure to pay.

In any action in which a court orders that payments for child support be made, the court shall provide in its order that the payments be paid to the state disbursement unit for remittance to the obligee.

Each party subject to the order shall immediately inform the state disbursement unit of the party’s:

Social security number;

Residential and mailing addresses and any change of address;

Telephone number;

Motor vehicle operator’s license number;

Employer’s name, address, and telephone number;

Electronic mail address; and

Change of any other condition which may affect the proper administration of this chapter.

Each order for payment of child support must notify each party of the requirements in subdivision a and require the party to provide the information within ten days from the date of the order or ten days after any change in the information.

In any subsequent child support enforcement or modification action between the parties, upon sufficient showing that diligent effort has been made to ascertain the location of a party, the court shall deem due process requirements for notice and service to have been met, with respect to the noticed party, by delivery of written notice to the most recent residential or employer address provided by the noticed party pursuant to this subsection.

The requirements of this subsection continue in effect until all child support obligations have been satisfied with respect to each child subject to the order.

Whenever there is failure to make the payments as required, the clerk of court, upon request of the obligee or child support agency, shall send notice of the arrears by first-class mail, with affidavit of service, to the person required to make the payments, or request a district judge of the judicial district to issue a citation for contempt of court against the person who has failed to make the payments. The citation may be served on that person by first-class mail with affidavit of service to the person’s last-known address.

The court of its own motion or on motion of the child support agency or the state’s attorney of the county of venue, the county of the recipient’s residence, or the county of the obligor’s residence may cause a support order in the action to be transcribed and filed with the clerk of the district court of any county in this state in which the obligee or the obligor may reside from time to time. Thereafter, this section applies as if the support order were issued by the district court of the county to which the support order is transcribed. No fee may be charged for transcribing or filing a support order under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 2; 1993, ch. 152, § 2; 1997, ch. 404, §§ 12, 13; 1999, ch. 142, § 1; 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2005, ch. 415, § 2; 2007, ch. 148, § 2; 2019, ch. 127, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 30, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

14-09-08.2.
Support for children after majority — Retroactive application.

A judgment or order requiring the payment of child support until the child attains majority continues as to the child until the end of the month during which the child is graduated from high school or attains the age of nineteen years, whichever occurs first, if:

The child is enrolled and attending high school and is eighteen years of age before the date the child is expected to be graduated; and

The child resides with the person to whom the duty of support is owed.

A judgment or order may require payment of child support after majority under substantially the circumstances described in subsection 1.

The person to whom the duty of support is owed under either subsection 1 or 2 may file an affidavit with the district court and provide a copy to the child support agency stating that the requirements of subsection 1 are met, the school in which the child is enrolled, and the anticipated date of the child’s graduation. Upon filing of the affidavit, the child support resumes pursuant to subsection 1 or pursuant to the terms of a judgment or order described in subsection 2. A fee may not be charged for filing such an affidavit.

The child support agency shall serve the affidavit by first-class mail upon the person owing the duty of support. If at any time thereafter the person owing the duty of support files a motion with the court, supported by that person’s affidavit that the child is no longer enrolled in or attending high school or is no longer residing with the person to whom the duty of support is owed, the court shall determine if the child is enrolled in and attending high school and residing with the person to whom the duty of support is owed and shall enter an order accordingly.

This section applies to child support orders concerning children described in subsection 1 or 2, regardless of the date of entry of the order.

This section does not preclude the entry of an order for child support which continues after the child reaches age eighteen, if the parties agree, or if the court determines the support to be appropriate.

For purposes of this section:

A child is treated as being in school during summer vacation if the child was enrolled in and attending school and did not graduate from high school at the end of the school period immediately preceding the summer vacation; and

A child who is currently enrolled in school is not considered to have graduated, even if all required coursework and examinations have been completed, until the ceremony is held by the school to commemorate the child’s graduation.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 180, § 1; 1991, ch. 151, § 1; 1993, ch. 152, § 3; 1999, ch. 143, § 1; 2007, ch. 148, § 3; 2009, ch. 419, § 1; 2015, ch. 126, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 30, § 7, effective July 1, 2021.

14-09-08.3.
Duration of child support obligations.

Unless dates for the commencement or termination of a child support obligation are specified by the court’s order, a judgment or order requiring the payment of child support is effective as to the child in the month in which the order is signed and continues until the end of the month in which the support obligation terminates.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 180, § 2; 1993, ch. 152, § 4.

14-09-08.4.
Periodic review of child support orders.

Each child support order being enforced by the child support agency must be reviewed by the child support agency no less frequently than thirty-six months after the establishment of the order or the most recent amendment or review of the order by the court or child support agency unless:

In the case of an order with respect to which there is in effect an assignment under chapter 50-09, the child support agency has determined that a review is not in the best interests of the child and neither the obligor nor the obligee has requested review;

In the case of any other order neither the obligor nor the obligee has requested review; or

In the case of a review requested by the obligor, the obligor failed to provide information required under subsection 1 of section 14-09-08.6 with the request for review.

Each child support order, in which there is in effect an assignment under chapter 50-09 or with respect to which either the obligor or the obligee has requested review, must be reviewed by the child support agency if:

More than twelve months have passed since the establishment of the order or the most recent amendment or review of that order by the court or child support agency, whichever is later; and

The order provides for no child support and was based on a finding that the obligor has no ability to pay child support.

If, upon review, the child support agency determines that the order provides for child support payments in an amount that is inconsistent with the amount that would be required by the child support guidelines established under subsection 1 of section 14-09-09.7, the child support agency may seek an amendment of the order. If the order provides for child support payments in an amount less than eighty-five percent or more than one hundred fifteen percent of the amount that would be required by those guidelines, the child support agency shall seek an amendment of the order.

If a child support obligation sought to be amended was entered at least one year before the filing of a motion or petition for amendment, the court shall order the amendment of the child support obligation to conform the amount of child support payment to that required under the child support guidelines, whether or not the motion or petition for amendment arises out of a periodic review of a child support obligation, and whether or not a material change of circumstances has taken place, unless the presumption that the correct amount of child support would result from the application of the child support guidelines is rebutted. If a motion or petition for amendment is filed within one year of the entry of the obligation sought to be amended, the party seeking amendment must also show a material change of circumstances.

A determination that a child who is the subject of a child support order is eligible for benefits furnished under subsection 16 or 18 of section 50-06-05.1 or chapter 50-09 or 50-24.1, or any substantially similar program operated by any state or tribal government, constitutes a material change of circumstances. The availability of health insurance at reasonable cost to a child who is the subject of a child support order constitutes a material change of circumstances. The need to provide for a child’s health care needs, through health insurance or other means, constitutes a material change of circumstances.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 17; 1991, ch. 152, § 2; 1993, ch. 2, § 7; 1993, ch. 152, §§ 5, 6; 1997, ch. 404, § 14; 1999, ch. 141, § 2; 2003, ch. 48, § 8; 2015, ch. 126, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 127, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

Parties.

The 1993 amendment to subsection 3 was intended to assure that the same process is available to all parties, including private parties, without regard to the involvement of child support officials. Shaver v. Kopp, 545 N.W.2d 170, 1996 N.D. LEXIS 71 (N.D. 1996).

14-09-08.5.
Notice of review of child support orders.

The child support agency shall provide written notice, including notice through electronic means, to the obligee and the obligor that a review under section 14-09-08.4 is commencing.

Unless sufficient information was previously provided by the obligor with a request for review, the notice to the obligor must inform the obligor of the duty to furnish the information required by section 14-09-08.6 and that a failure to furnish the required information may result in the entry of an order compelling the furnishing of the information. The notice must be accompanied by an income report form, together with instructions for the accurate completion of the income report form.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 18; 1993, ch. 152, § 7; 2005, ch. 54, § 1; 2015, ch. 126, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

14-09-08.6.
Obligor’s duties upon review.

Unless sufficient information was previously provided by the obligor with a request for review, the obligor shall provide information to the child support agency concerning the obligor’s income, which is sufficient to accomplish the review, by the date required by the child support agency. The information must be furnished by providing:

An income report, in the form and manner required by the child support agency, accurately completed and attested to by the obligor;

Earnings statements secured from the obligor’s current income payer if the obligor changed employment after the end of the latest income tax year for which the obligor filed a return; and

A verified copy of the latest income tax return, filed with the internal revenue service or any state official administering a state income tax, which accurately reports the obligor’s income for a fiscal year ending no more than seventeen months prior to the date of the review.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 19; 1993, ch. 152, § 8; 1997, ch. 404, § 15; 1999, ch. 141, § 3; 2015, ch. 126, § 4, effective August 1, 2015.

14-09-08.7.
Notice of review determination.

Following review, the child support agency shall promptly provide notice of its review determination.

If the child support agency has made a determination not to seek an amendment to the amount of child support, the notice must inform the obligor and the obligee of the right of each to challenge that determination by seeking an amendment to the amount of child support, from the court, at any time before the termination of the support order.

If the child support agency has made a determination to seek an amendment to the amount of child support, the notice must inform the obligor and the obligee of the opportunity of each to consent to the proposed amendment and the right of each to challenge that determination by opposing that amendment before the court.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 20; 2005, ch. 54, § 2; 2015, ch. 126, § 5, effective August 1, 2015.

14-09-08.8.
Motion for amendment of child support order — How made — Presumption when obligor’s income unknown. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 21; 1993, ch. 2, § 8; 1993, ch. 152, § 9; 2005, ch. 54, § 3; repealed by 2015, ch. 126, § 14, effective August 1, 2015.

14-09-08.9.
Request for review — Notice of right to request review.

An obligor or an obligee may request review under section 14-09-08.4, by applying to the child support agency for child support services, and indicating, in the manner there provided, a desire to have a child support order reviewed. Each judgment or order issued by a court in this state which includes an order for child support must include a statement advising of the right to request a review under this section. If a party to a child support matter is receiving services from the child support agency and an order for current child support has issued out of that matter, the child support agency shall provide notice of the right to request a review or further review of that child support order, to the obligor and obligee, not more than three years after the most recent child support order, review of that child support order, or notice of right to request a review of that child support order.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 22; 1997, ch. 404, § 16; 2005, ch. 54, § 4.

14-09-08.10.
Order. [Contingent expiration date – See note]

Each order entered under this code for the support of a minor child or the support of a child after majority under section 14-09-08.2 must include a provision for health insurance coverage for that child.

Except as provided in subsection 2, the order must require the obligor to provide satisfactory health insurance coverage whenever that coverage is available at reasonable cost or becomes available at reasonable cost.

If the obligee is an individual with physical custody of the child, the obligee must be required to provide satisfactory health insurance whenever that coverage is available at no or nominal cost.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 23; 1997, ch. 404, § 17; 1999, ch. 141, § 4; 2007, ch. 149, § 1; 2013, ch. 124, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter, S.L. 2013 becomes effective on the date the department of human services certifies to the legislative council as the effective date of rules adopted to implement this Act.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 149, S.L. 2007 becomes effective on the date the Department of Human Services certifies to the Legislative Council as the effective date of rules adopted to implement this Act.

14-09-08.10.
Order. [Contingent expiration date – See note]

Each order entered under this code for the support of a minor child or the support of a child after majority under section 14-09-08.2 must include a provision for the child’s health insurance coverage or other medical support. Responsibility for the child’s health insurance coverage or other medical support must be established according to rules adopted by the child support agency. To the extent permitted by federal law and rules promulgated by the secretary of the United States department of health and human services, the rules adopted under this section must include a reasonable cost standard which considers the income of the obligated parent and the cost of health insurance coverage.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 23; 1997, ch. 404, § 17; 1999, ch. 141, § 4; 2007, ch. 149, § 1; 2013, ch. 124, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter, S.L. 2013 becomes effective on the date the department of human services certifies to the legislative council as the effective date of rules adopted to implement this Act.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 149, S.L. 2007 becomes effective on the date the Department of Human Services certifies to the Legislative Council as the effective date of rules adopted to implement this Act.

14-09-08.11.
Eligible child — Employer to permit enrollment — Employer duties and liabilities — Obligor contest. [Contingent expiration date – See note]

When an obligor is required to cover a child as a beneficiary under section 14-09-08.10, the child is eligible for health insurance coverage as a dependent of the obligor. If health insurance coverage required under section 14-09-08.10 is available through an employer, the employer must:

Permit the obligor to enroll under family coverage any child who is otherwise eligible for coverage without regard to any open enrollment restrictions;

If the obligor is enrolled but fails to make application to obtain coverage for the child, enroll the child under family coverage upon application by the obligee;

Upon receipt of the national medical support notice issued under section 14-09-08.20:

Comply with the provisions of the national medical support notice; and

Transfer the national medical support notice to the insurer that provides any such health insurance coverage for which the child is eligible, within twenty business days after the date of the national medical support notice;

Not disenroll or eliminate coverage for any child unless the employer has eliminated family health coverage for all of its employees or the employer is provided satisfactory written evidence that:

The order issued under section 14-09-08.10 is no longer in effect; or

The child is or will be enrolled in comparable coverage that will take effect no later than the effective date of disenrollment;

Withhold from the obligor’s compensation the obligor’s share, if any, of premiums for health insurance coverage and pay this amount to the insurer;

If the amount required to be withheld under subdivision e, either alone or when added to the total of any withholding required by an order issued under section 14-09-09.15, exceeds fifty percent of the obligor’s disposable income, withhold fifty percent of the obligor’s disposable income;

In the case of an obligor contest under subsection 2, initiate and continue withholding until the employer receives notice that the contest is resolved; and

Promptly notify the child support agency, in the same manner as required under subsection 9 of section 14-09-09.16, whenever the obligor’s employment is terminated.

The obligor may contest the withholding provided for in subdivision e of subsection 1 by filing a request for a hearing within ten days of the date of the national medical support notice issued under section 14-09-08.20. If the obligor contests that withholding, the court shall:

Hold a hearing within ten working days after the date of the request; and

Confirm the withholding in the absence of a finding:

Of a mistake of fact; or

That the obligee is required to provide health insurance coverage pursuant to section 14-09-08.10.

The withholding provided in subdivision e of subsection 1 has priority over any other legal process against the same income except that withholding required by an order issued under section 14-09-09.15 must be satisfied before any payment is made to the insurer. If the amount remaining is insufficient to pay the obligor’s share of premiums for health insurance coverage, the obligor may authorize additional withholding to pay the obligor’s share. If the obligor does not authorize additional withholding, and the health insurance coverage will lapse as a result, the employer must promptly inform the child support agency of the insufficiency.

An employer receiving a national medical support notice under this section is subject to the same duties and liabilities as an income payer under section 14-09-09.3 unless the context indicates otherwise.

For purposes of this section:

“Employer” means an entity or individual who would be determined to be an employer under section 3401(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended [26 U.S.C. 3401(d)], and includes any governmental entity and any labor organization; and

“Insurer” has the meaning provided in section 26.1-36.5-01.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 24; 1993, ch. 152, § 10; 1995, ch. 461, § 1; 1997, ch. 404, § 18; 1999, ch. 141, § 5; 2003, ch. 125, § 1; 2007, ch. 149, § 2; 2015, ch. 126, § 6.